Idaho, session 2026, S1334.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The Legislature finds
that:
(a) Clause 11, Section 8, Article I of the Constitution of the United
States vests in the Congress the power to declare war. The Legislature
further recognizes that Clause 15, Section 8, Article I authorizes Con-
gress to call forth the militia to execute the laws of the Union, repel
invasion, and suppress insurrection;
(b) The Governor serves as the commander in chief of the organized mili-
tia of the State of Idaho except when such forces are lawfully called
into federal service pursuant to the Constitution of the United States;
and
(c) The State of Idaho retains authority to prescribe by law the duties
and limitations applicable to state officers acting under the Constitu-
tion of the State of Idaho and laws of this state.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify the constitutional
conditions under which the Governor may authorize entry of the organized
militia into active duty combat service, consistent with the allocation of
powers set forth in the Constitution of the United States.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2364, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2364. GOVERNOR'S AUTHORITY REGARDING ACTIVE DUTY COMBAT SERVICE OF
THE ORGANIZED MILITIA. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Active duty combat" means performing one of the following services
in the active federal military service of the United States:
(i) Participation in an armed conflict;
(ii) Performance of a hazardous service relating to an armed con-
flict in a foreign state; or
(iii) Performance of a duty through an instrumentality of war.
(b) "Official declaration of war" means an official declaration of war
made by the United States congress pursuant to clause 11, section 8, ar-
ticle I of the constitution of the United States.


(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the governor
shall not authorize the organized militia of the state of Idaho, or any mem-
ber thereof, to enter active duty combat unless:
(a) The United States congress has passed an official declaration of
war; or
(b) The United States has taken official action pursuant to clause 15,
section 8, article I of the constitution of the United States to explic-
itly call forth the Idaho national guard and any member thereof for the
enumerated purposes of executing the laws of the union, repelling inva-
sion, or suppressing insurrection.
(3) The governor shall take all actions necessary to comply with the re-
quirements of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict participa-
tion in non-combat federal service, including training or administrative
duty.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit the
governor from authorizing or maintaining members of the organized militia in
duty status pursuant to 32 U.S.C. 101 et seq., or from authorizing defense
support for civil authorities missions within the United States or United
States territories.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.